src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kastid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kästiđ: # ML checked

    kästiđ+V+Inf: kästiđ 
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: kastuđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastuum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kastuuh
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kástoo
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kástojeen
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kastuuvettee
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kastuv
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kastup
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kastuuvetteđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kástojeh
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kástojim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kástojih
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kastui
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kastuim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kastuid
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kastuin
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kastuim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kastuid
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kástojii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kastuuččim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kastuuččih
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kastuuččij
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kastuuččáim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kastuuččáid
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kastuuččáin
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kastuuččijm
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kastuuččijd
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kastuuččii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kastuu
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kastuuččii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [kástojeijee, kástojijjee]
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: kastuumin
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: kastuumist
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: kastuumân
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: kastuudijn
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kastuuhánnáá
    kästiđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kästistâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kästittâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kästiškuáđám
